Missouri, session 2026, HB3326.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 537, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 537.042, to read as follows:
537.042. 1. No charitable organization, or an employee or a volunteer acting on
behalf of the charitable organization, acting in good faith shall be held civilly liable for
disclosing a communication reasonably believed to be true regarding an individual
made directly to another charitable organization, or employee or volunteer acting on
behalf of the charitable organization, to the extent the communication concerns an
allegation that the individual has:
(1) Engaged in sexual misconduct;
(2) Sexually abused another individual;
(3) Sexually harassed another individual; or
(4) Committed any sexual offense under chapter 566 or 573.
2. This section shall not apply to an individual reporting his or her own
experience of sexual abuse or harassment or to any person acting in bad faith or with
malicious intent.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.